Massachusetts, session 194th, S673.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Secretary of Energy and Environmental Affairs, in consultation with
the Massachusetts Clean Energy Center, is hereby authorized and directed to develop and
implement the framework of a regional compact among the states of Massachusetts, New
Hampshire, Maine, Vermont, and Connecticut for the purposes of research and development
regarding energy produced by nuclear fusion. Said compact shall include, but not be limited to,
the mission of the compact, specific focus areas, personnel and financial requirements, and other
elements necessary to the operation of the compact.
SECTION 2. The compact shall include the development and implementation of a
comprehensive plan to obtain all necessary regulatory approvals for, finance, and operate, one or
more nuclear fusion reactors for research, provided that the costs of such actions shall be
addressed by a formula to facilitate fair contributions from each member state, together with any
gifts or grants, including but not limited to those provided by the United States Department of
of 3

Energy. Such plan may include recommendations for regulatory or statutory measures to assess
regulated energy companies for costs associated with the compact.
SECTION 3. The secretary shall establish a Fusion Research Council to provide guidance
in carrying out the provisions of this act. Said council shall consist of the secretary, who shall
serve as its chair, the executive director of the clean energy center, the secretary of economic
development or a designee, the commissioner of the department of environmental protection or a
designee, and 7 members appointed by the governor, whom shall include individuals
representing 3 institutions of higher learning in the commonwealth, 1 of which shall be the
University of Massachusetts and 1 of which shall be the Massachusetts Institute of Technology,
1 member representing employers in the commonwealth, 1 member representing organized
labor in the commonwealth, 1 member representing an organization engaged in independent
nuclear energy research in the commonwealth, and 1 member representing the taxpayers of the
commonwealth. The council shall convene as deemed necessary by its chair, but not less than
quarterly.
SECTION 4. The secretary, in accordance with the plan developed pursuant to this act,
and subject to the approval of the governor and the great and general court, shall solicit member
states for participation in the compact, provided that such states shall designate representatives
according to the terms of the compact. Representatives shall serve for a term, and under such
conditions, as the state being represented shall establish.
SECTION 5. The secretary shall submit the plan developed pursuant to section 1 in the
form of legislation filed with the clerk of the Senate not later than 12 months following the
passage of this act, the passage of which shall constitute the approval prescribed in section 4.
of 3

SECTION 6. The secretary shall file reports detailing the progress made in the
development of the compact, any costs estimates for its implementation, and any
recommendations for legislative or regulatory actions to advance the mission of the compact, not
less than every three months, with the clerks of the House and Senate, the Joint Committee on
Telecommunications and Energy, and the House and Senate Committees on Ways and Means.
of 3